Louisiana, session 2026, SB277.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:95(H) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§95. Illegal carrying of weapons
* * *
H.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (A)(4) of this Section and in
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the provisions of this Section shall not prohibit
active justices or judges of the supreme court, courts of appeal, district courts, parish
courts, juvenile courts, family courts, city courts, federal courts domiciled in the state
of Louisiana, and traffic courts; members of either house of the legislature; officers
of either house of the legislature; the legislative auditor; designated investigative
auditors; constables; coroners; designated coroner investigators; district attorneys
and designated assistant district attorneys; United States attorneys and assistant
United States attorneys and investigators; the governor; a designated assistant to
the governor; the lieutenant governor; a designated assistant to the lieutenant
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 277 ENROLLED
governor; the secretary of state; a designated assistant to the secretary of state;
the treasurer; a designated assistant to the treasurer; the commissioner of
agriculture and forestry; a designated assistant to the commissioner of
agriculture and forestry; the commissioner of insurance; a designated assistant
to the commissioner of insurance; the attorney general; designated assistant
attorneys general; city prosecutors; designated assistant city prosecutors; a United
States representative from Louisiana and his designated, employed congressional
staffer; a United States senator from Louisiana and his designated, employed
congressional staffer; justices of the peace; parish presidents; and mayor-presidents
from possessing and concealing a handgun on their person when such persons are
qualified annually in the use of firearms by the Council on Peace Officer Standards
and Training.
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall permit the carrying of a weapon in the
state capitol building with the exception of the following state officials, who may
carry within the entirety of the state capitol building, if they are annually
qualified in the use of firearms by the Council on Peace Officer Standards and
Training:
(a) The attorney general and members of his Louisiana Bureau of
Investigation security detail.
(b) Members of the legislature.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall permit the carrying of a weapon in
the state capitol building, with the exception of the following state officials who
may carry within the state capitol building except for within the chamber of the
Senate, the chamber of the House of Representatives, and any legislative
committee room, if the officials are annually qualified in the use of firearms by
the Council on Peace Officer Standards and Training:
(a) The governor and a designated member of his staff.
(b) The lieutenant governor and a designated member of his staff.
(c) The secretary of state and a designated member of his staff.
(d) The treasurer and a designated member of his staff.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 277 ENROLLED
(e) The commissioner of agriculture and forestry and a designated
member of his staff.
(f) The commissioner of insurance and a designated member of his staff.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.